src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v4_pajeta-dial_Por_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pajeta  - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     pajeta+V+Inf: pajeta
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pakenen
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pakenet
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pakenee
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pakenemma
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pakenetta
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pajethaan
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pakenin
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pakenit
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pakeni
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pakenimma
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pakenitta
     pajeta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pajethiin
     pajeta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pajenu
     pajeta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pajettu
     pajeta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pajenheet
     pajeta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pakeneeva
     pajeta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pakeneevat
     pajeta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pajettava
     pajeta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pajettavat
     
     pajeta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: pakenisin
     pajeta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: pakenisit
     pajeta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: pakenis
     pajeta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: pakenisima
     pajeta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: pakenisitta
     pajeta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: pajettais
     pajeta+V+Pass+Cond: pajettais
    
     pajeta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: pakene
     pajeta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: pajekkaa
     
     pajeta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: pakenemassa
     pajeta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: pakenemasta
     pajeta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: pakenemhaan
     pajeta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: pakenemala
     pajeta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: pakenematta
